Hawaii, session 2025, HB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 as a grant-in-aid to the city and county of Honolulu department of the prosecuting attorney for the victim witness assistance program, including the hiring of necessary staff. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu department of the prosecuting attorney for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.